Massachusetts, session 194th, S1692.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 36 of Chapter 135 of the Acts of 2024, is hereby amended by deleting it in its
entirety, and inserting in place thereof the following:-
Section 122D. No person shall purchase or possess self-defense spray who:
(i) in a court of the commonwealth, has been convicted or adjudicated a youthful offender
or delinquent child as defined in section 52 of chapter 119 for the commission of: (A) a felony;
(B) a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for more than 2 years; (C) a violent crime as
defined in section 121; (D) a violation of a law regulating the use, possession, ownership,
transfer, purchase, sale, lease, rental, receipt or transportation of weapons or ammunition for
which a term of imprisonment may be imposed; or (E) a violation of a law regulating the use,
possession or sale of a controlled substance as defined in section 1 of chapter 94C including, but
not limited to, a violation under said chapter 94C; provided, however, that except for the
commission of a violent crime or a crime involving the trafficking of controlled substances, if the
of 4

person has been so convicted or adjudicated or released from confinement, probation or parole
supervision for such conviction or adjudication, whichever occurs last, for 5 or more years
immediately preceding the purchase or possession, that person may purchase or possess self-
defense spray;
(ii) in another state or federal jurisdiction, has been convicted or adjudicated a youthful
offender or delinquent child for the commission of: (A) a felony; (B) a misdemeanor punishable
by imprisonment for more than 2 years; (C) a violent crime as defined in section 121; (D) a
violation of a law regulating the use, possession, ownership, transfer, purchase, sale, lease,
rental, receipt or transportation of weapons or ammunition for which a term of imprisonment
may be imposed; or (E) a violation of a law regulating the use, possession or sale of a controlled
substance as defined in section 1 of chapter 94C; provided, however, that, except for the
commission of a violent crime or a crime involving the trafficking of weapons or controlled
substances, if the person has been so convicted or adjudicated or released from confinement,
probation or parole supervision for such conviction or adjudication, whichever occurs last, for 5
or more years immediately preceding the purchase or possession and that applicant's right or
ability to possess a rifle or shotgun has been fully restored in the jurisdiction wherein the subject
conviction or adjudication was entered, then that person may purchase or possess self-defense
spray;
(iii) has been committed to any hospital or institution for mental illness unless the person
obtains, prior to purchase or possession, an affidavit of a licensed physician or clinical
psychologist attesting that such physician or psychologist is familiar with the applicant's mental
illness and that in the physician's or psychologist's opinion the applicant is not disabled by such
an illness in a manner that shall prevent the applicant from possessing self-defense spray;
of 4

(iv) is or has been in recovery from or committed based upon a finding that the person is
a person with an alcohol use disorder or a substance use disorder or both unless a licensed
physician or clinical psychologist deems such person to be in recovery from such condition, in
which case, such person may purchase or possess self-defense spray after 5 years from the date
of such confinement or recovery; provided, however, that prior to such purchase or possession of
self-defense spray, the applicant shall submit an affidavit issued by a licensed physician or
clinical psychologist attesting that such physician or psychologist knows the person's history of
treatment and that in that physician's or psychologist's opinion the applicant is in recovery;
(v) at the time of the application, is younger than 15 years of age;
(vi) at the time of the application, is at least 15 years of age but less than 18 years of age
unless the applicant submits with the application a certificate from the applicant's parent or
guardian granting the applicant permission to apply for a card;
(vii) is an alien who does not maintain lawful permanent residency or is an alien not
residing under a visa pursuant to 8 U.S.C § 1101(a)(15)(U), or is an alien not residing under a
visa pursuant to 8 U.S.C. § 1154(a)(1)(B)(ii)(I) or is an alien not residing under a visa pursuant
to 8 U.S.C. § 1101(a)(15)(T)(i)(I)–(IV);
(viii) is currently subject to: (1) an order for suspension or surrender issued pursuant to
section 3B or 3C of chapter 209A or section 7 of chapter 258E; or (2) a permanent or temporary
protection order issued pursuant to chapter 209A or section 7 of chapter 258E; or
(ix) is currently the subject of an outstanding arrest warrant in any state or federal
jurisdiction.
of 4

Whoever purchases or possesses self-defense spray in violation of this section shall be
punished by a fine of not more than $1,000 or by imprisonment in a house of correction for not
more than 2 years or both such fine and imprisonment.
of 4